Hawaii, session 2025, GM1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Anemonia majano, or
2 the majano anemone, is an invasive species that was detected in
3 Kaneohe Bay during the follow-up monitoring of a previous
4 non-native coral removal site. Majano anemone, originally
5 introduced as a hitchhiker on the released non-native corals,
6 has spread to blanket an area of about nine hundred fifty square
7 yards. This invasive anemone severely threatens Kaneohe Bay’s
8 delicate coral reef ecosystem, particularly the endemic finger
9 coral Porites compressa. Known for its rapid growth and spread
10 throughout various substrates, aggressive competition for space,
11 and ability to smother native coral species, the majano anemone
12 has previously outcompeted stony corals in the Philippines and
13 Vietnam, resulting in phase shifts to corallimorpharia-dominated
14 communities. Left unchecked, the majano anemone could
15 significantly degrade reef health and fish habitat, harm marine
16 biodiversity, and disrupt vital ecosystem services relied upon
17 by the coastal communities in Hawaii.
2025-3344 HB1220 GDI HMSO
Hiuiiiiiiuiiiiiittnii

Page 2 H.B. NO. 1220
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 The legislature further finds that the department of land
2 and natural resources' division of aquatic resources has
3 proposed a multi-phase removal strategy tailored to the biology
4 of the majano anemone that involves chemical control and
5 physical removal and smothering practices. Supporting these
6 efforts may prevent further damage and spread of the majano
7 anemone, ensuring that the State’s coral reefs and marine
8 ecosystems remain health and vibrant.
9 The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to support
10 the efforts of the division of aquatic resources in the removal
11 of the majano anemone from Kaneohe Bay.
12 SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
13 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much
14 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
15 same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
16 2026-2027 to support the division of aquatic resources in
17 removing majano anemone from Kaneohe Bay, including personnel,
18 materials and equipment, data management and analysis, and
19 outreach and community engagement.
20 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
21 of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
2025-3344 HB1220 CDl HMSO 2
IIUIIIIIIIMIIIIiniBIII

Pages 1220
H.B. NO.
T
to
d
Q
Q
Q
1 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3344 HB1220 CDl HMSO 3
iHonmiiiiniiHnHii

1220
H.B. NO.
I
M
O
b
o
b
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1220, HD1,SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certily that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1220, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
152